Washington statutes.
RCW 11.56.050

Order directing sale.

If the court should determine that it is necessary to sell any or all of the real estate for the purposes mentioned in this title, then it may make and cause to be entered an order directing the personal representative to sell so much of the real estate as the court may determine necessary for the purposes aforesaid. Such order shall give a particular description of the property to be sold and the terms of such sale and shall provide whether such property shall be sold at public or private sale, or by negotiation. After the giving of such order it shall be the duty of the personal representative to sell such real estate in accordance with the order of the court and as in this title provided with reference to the public or private sales of real estate.

[ 1994 c 221 s 49; 1965 c 145 s 11.56.050. Prior: 1917 c 156 s 126; RRS s 1496; prior: Code 1881 s 1494; 1854 p 285 s 104.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—1994 c 221: See note following RCW 11.100.035.

Abatement of assets: Chapter 11.10 RCW.